Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF24.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1881XS (5) 91 th/ns S.F. 24 Section 1. Section 327G.25, Code 2025, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 327G.25 Closing of crossing for repair or upgrade. 3 1. A railway railroad corporation shall not close a railway 4 crossing to the traveling public for more than thirty twenty 5 consecutive days for the purpose of repairing or upgrading the 6 crossing. 7 2. Before closing a railway crossing, a railroad 8 corporation shall provide notice to the county board of 9 supervisors or city council that has jurisdiction over the 10 crossing detailing the work to be completed, the expected date 11 the work will be completed, and the procedures the corporation 12 will use to close and reopen the crossing. 13 3. Notwithstanding subsection 1, the county board of 14 supervisors or city council that has jurisdiction over a 15 closed crossing may agree that a crossing may be closed for an 16 additional twenty consecutive days. A railroad corporation 17 seeking to extend the closure of a crossing shall provide 18 notice to the applicable board or council detailing the 19 remaining work to be completed, the expected date the remaining 20 work will be completed, and the procedures the corporation will 21 use to reopen the crossing. Such notice shall be provided by 22 the railroad corporation no later than the seventeenth day 23 after the crossing was closed. 24 4. A railway railroad corporation violating this section 25 shall, upon conviction, be subject to a schedule âoneâ âfourâ 26 penalty under section 327C.5 for each day a crossing is closed 27 after the number of days allowed in subsection 1 or 3, as 28 applicable . 29